Utah statutes.
73-10e-4.   Authority to transfer funds.
The Division of Water Resources may transfer money to the Department of
Transportation, as necessary under this chapter, to construct projects whose
purposes are primarily to protect state highways or to study or construct
Option B set forth in Subsection 73-10e-1(4)(c)(i)(B).
